Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 20.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-394
Registration under unified carrier registration plan and agreement; fees; authorization to accept registration.

(1) No foreign or domestic motor carrier, private carrier, leasing company, broker, or freight forwarder shall operate any motor vehicle on a highway of this state or in interstate commerce without first being registered in this state or another jurisdiction pursuant to the unified carrier registration plan and agreement and having paid all fees required under the unified carrier registration plan and agreement for such registration. A motor carrier, private carrier, leasing company, broker, or freight forwarder with its principal place of business in this state shall register in this state with and pay its required registration fees to the division. The division shall remit the fees to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.

(2) The division may accept the registration of and fees required from a foreign or domestic motor carrier, private carrier, leasing company, broker, or freight forwarder that maintains an office in this state but does not have its principal place of business in the United States or that maintains an office in this state but has its principal place of business in another jurisdiction that does not participate in the unified carrier registration plan and agreement. The division shall remit the fees to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.

Laws 2007, LB358, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 20.
August 30, 2009